Alaska, session 34, SB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.404(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) A recipient of a permit transferred [TO QUALIFY AS A 06 SUBSTITUTE] under this section [, AN INDIVIDUAL] must qualify under the 07 same conditions that applied to the person to whom the hunting permit was 08 originally awarded [BE A STATE RESIDENT]. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.404(c) is amended to read: 10 (c) A [AN APPLICATION TO] transfer or reissue of a hunting permit under 11 (a) of this section may be made only before the end of the period during which the 12 hunting permit is valid. A transfer of a hunting permit under (f) of this section may 13 be made only before the first day of the open season for the hunt for which the 14 permit is issued. 01 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.404(d) is amended to read: 02 (d) [A HUNTING PERMIT MAY ONLY BE TRANSFERRED OR 03 REISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION TO A SUBSTITUTE WHO IS QUALIFIED 04 UNDER THE CONDITIONS THAT APPLIED TO THE PERSON TO WHOM THE 05 HUNTING PERMIT WAS ORIGINALLY AWARDED.] A hunting permit may be 06 transferred or reissued under this section only for the specific hunt for which the 07 permit was originally awarded. 08 * Sec. 4. AS 16.05.404 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 09 (f) The original holder of a hunting permit for a hunt that was originally 10 awarded by drawing established by the Board of Game under AS 16.05.255(a) may 11 transfer the permit to another person, with or without monetary consideration, if the 12 permittee 13 (1) notifies the department of the transfer before the transfer is 14 effective; and 15 (2) includes in the notification to the department the name and hunting 16 license number of the recipient and any other identifying information required by the 17 department. 18 (g) A person may not hold more than one drawing permit for the same species 19 at one time, regardless of whether the permit was obtained by drawing or transfer. 20 (h) The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this section and 21 may establish and provide for the collection of a fee for registering a transfer or 22 reissuance, not to exceed the estimated actual administrative costs of providing the 23 service. 24 (i) A person who receives a permit transferred under this section acquires only 25 the rights held by the original permittee and is subject to all conditions, regulations, 26 and limitations that applied to the original permit, including emergency orders closing 27 or restricting a hunt. The state is not liable for any loss, financial or otherwise, 28 incurred by a person who receives a transferred permit. 29 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.